Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska12-806
Abandoned or neglected cemeteries; care; item in county budget.

The county board may include in the budget for the next fiscal year an item for care of abandoned or neglected cemeteries as provided in section 12-805.

Laws 1949, c. 35, § 2, p. 128;

R.S.1943, (1974), § 23-113.01;

Laws 2008, LB995, § 4.